Washington statutes.
RCW 43.52.515

Application of Titles 9 and 9A RCW.

All of the provisions of Titles 9 and 9A RCW apply to actions of a joint operating agency.

[ 1981 c 173 s 6.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 173: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1981 c 173 s 9.]